Maine, session 132, LD1959.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2491, sub-§7-F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 176, §3, is further
amended to read:
7-F. Lodging place. "Lodging place" means a fixed structure, or any part of a
structure, used, maintained or advertised as a place where sleeping accommodations are
furnished that offers stays that are temporary in nature and consist of fewer than 183 days
in the aggregate per year. "Lodging place" includes accommodations in the entertainment,
hospitality, recreation and tourism industries, including, but not limited to, hotels, motels,
bed and breakfasts, inns and properties under common management at the same location
where 4 or more rooms, cottages or condominium units are available. "Lodging place"
does not include vacation rentals, youth camps, dormitories of charitable, educational or
philanthropic institutions, fraternity or sorority houses affiliated with educational
institutions, permanent residences, rental properties with tenant and landlord relationships
as described under Title 14, chapters 709 to 710‑D, nursing facilities as defined in section
1812‑A, assisted living facilities as defined in section 7852, subsection 4‑A or, residential
care facilities as defined in section 7852, subsection 14 or emergency shelters.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4308, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended by enacting after the 2nd blocked paragraph a new blocked paragraph to
read:
The maximum level of assistance for emergency shelter is the actual cost of providing
emergency shelter services.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4308, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
The department may not adopt any rule that reduces or otherwise restricts maximum levels
of assistance for providing emergency shelter or that establishes maximum time periods for
eligibility for emergency housing assistance that are more restrictive than limits established
in this chapter.
Sec. 4. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2023.